Utah statutes.
10-9a-407.   Effect of official maps.
(1)  Municipalities may adopt an official map.
(2) (a)  An official map does not:
(i)  require a landowner to dedicate and construct a street as a condition of
development approval, except under circumstances provided in Subsection
(2)(b)(iii); or
(ii)  require a municipality to immediately acquire property it has designated
for eventual use as a public street.
(b)  This section does not prohibit a municipality from:
(i) recommending that an applicant consider and accommodate the location of
the proposed streets in the planning of a development proposal in a manner
that is consistent with Section 10-9a-508;
(ii)  acquiring the property through purchase, gift, voluntary dedication, or
eminent domain; or
(iii)  requiring the dedication and improvement of a street if the street is
found necessary by the municipality because of a proposed development and if
the dedication and improvement are consistent with Section 10-9a-508.
